Illinois, session 104th, SB2141.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Residential Real Property Disclosure Act is 5amended by adding Section 46 as follows: 6    (765 ILCS 77/46 new)7    Sec. 46. Condition, stipulation, or provision void. Any 8condition, stipulation, or provision in any mortgage, 9promissory note, or contract directly affecting an interest in 10Illinois real estate shall state that Illinois law shall 11apply. Any condition, stipulation, or provision purporting to 12apply the law of another state or country is void. 13    Section 10. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 14Practices Act is amended by changing Section 2A as follows: 15    (815 ILCS 505/2A)  (from Ch. 121 1/2, par. 262A)16    Sec. 2A. (1) The use or employment of any chain referral 17sales technique, plan, arrangement or agreement whereby the 18buyer is induced to purchase merchandise upon the seller's 19promise or representation that if buyer will furnish seller 20names of other prospective buyers or like or identical 21merchandise that seller will contact the named prospective   SB2141- 2 -LRB104 08293 JRC 18344 b1buyers and buyer will receive a reduction in the purchase 2price by means of a cash rebate, commission, credit toward 3balance due or any other consideration, which rebate, 4commission, credit or other consideration is contingent upon 5seller's ability to sell like or identical merchandise to the 6named prospective buyers, is declared to be an unlawful 7practice within the meaning of this Act.8    (2) It is an unlawful practice within the meaning of this 9Act for any person, by himself or through others, to sell, 10offer to sell, or attempt to sell the right to participate in a 11pyramid sales scheme.12    (3) It is an unlawful practice for any person to insert a 13provision in any mortgage, promissory note, or other contract 14directly affecting a consumer's ownership of Illinois real 15estate which states that the law of a state or country other 16than Illinois shall apply. Any such provision purporting to 17apply the law of another state or country in such consumer 18transaction is void. 19(Source: P.A. 83-808.)